Virginia statutes. Title 24.2. Elections.
Article 6. Vacancies in Elected Constitutional and Local Offices.

§ 24.2-225.
Applicability.

This article applies to vacancies in any elected constitutional or local office if there is no other statutory or charter provision for filling a vacancy in the office. Further provisions within this article which specifically override other statutory or charter provisions shall prevail.

History.

Code 1950, § 24-145; 1958, c. 621; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-76; 1975, c. 515; 1976, c. 616; 1977, c. 490; 1984, c. 480; 1993, c. 641.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

3C M.J. Clerks of Court, § 8; 5A M.J. Counties, §§ 40, 42.

§ 24.2-226.
Election to fill vacancy.

A vacancy in any elected local office, whether occurring when for any reason an officer-elect does not take office or occurring after an officer begins his term, shall be filled as provided by §

24.2-228

or for constitutional officers as provided in §

24.2-228.1

, or unless provided otherwise by statute or charter requiring special elections within the time limits provided in this title. The governing body or, in the case of an elected school board, the school board of the county, city, or town in which the vacancy occurs shall, within 15 days of the occurrence of the vacancy, petition the circuit court to issue a writ of election to fill the vacancy as set forth in Article 5 (§

24.2-681

et seq.) of Chapter 6. Either upon receipt of the petition or on its own motion, the court shall issue the writ ordering the election promptly and shall order the special election to be held on the date of the next general election in November or in May if the vacant office is regularly scheduled by law to be filled in May. However, if the governing body or the school board requests in its petition a different date for the election, the court shall order the special election be held on that date, so long as the date requested precedes the date of such next general election and complies with the provisions of §

24.2-682

. If the vacancy occurs within 90 days of the next such general election and the governing body or the school board has not requested in its petition a different date for the election, the special election shall be held on the date of the second such general election. Upon receipt of written notification by an officer or officer-elect of his resignation as of a stated date, the governing body or school board, as the case may be, may immediately petition the circuit court to issue a writ of election, and the court may immediately issue the writ to call the election. The officer’s or officer-elect’s resignation shall not be revocable after the date stated by him for his resignation or after the forty-fifth day before the date set for the special election. The person so elected shall hold the office for the remaining portion of the regular term of the office for which the vacancy is being filled.

Notwithstanding any provision of law or charter to the contrary, no election to fill a vacancy shall be ordered or held if the general election at which it is to be called is scheduled within 60 days of the end of the term of the office to be filled.

Notwithstanding any provision of law or charter to the contrary, when an interim appointment to a vacancy in any governing body or elected school board has been made by the remaining members thereof, no election to fill the vacancy shall be ordered or held if the general election at which it is to be called is scheduled in the year in which the term expires.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 24-145, 24-147.1; 1958, c. 621; 1970, c. 462, §§ 24.1-76, 24.1-79; 1975, c. 515; 1976, c. 616; 1977, c. 490; 1984, c. 480; 1993, c. 641; 1996, c. 873; 2000, cc. 787, 1045, 1070; 2003, c. 1015; 2010, cc. 431, 449, 645; 2011, c. 206; 2014, c. 476.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendments by cc. 787, 1045, and 1070 are identical, and in the first sentence in subsection A, deleted “constitutional or” following “elected” near the beginning of the sentence, and inserted “or for constitutional officers as provided in §

24.2-228.1

”; in the third sentence in subsection A, deleted “officers and city constitutional officers” following “county,” and inserted “or town officers regularly elected in November,” following “city.”

Acts 2000, cc. 787 and 1045 are effective October 1, 2000. Acts 2000, c. 1045 is effective July 1, 2000.
Hence the changes are treated as not postponed.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 1015, in subsection A, substituted “15” for “fifteen” in the second sentence, and inserted the fifth and sixth sentences; and substituted “60” for “sixty” in subsection B.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 431, in subsection A, in the first sentence, substituted “as provided” for “by special election except as provided for certain towns” and inserted “requiring special elections within the time limits provided in this title,” in the third sentence, substituted “promptly, which shall be no later than the next general election unless the vacancy occurs within 90 days of the next general election in which event it shall be held promptly but no later than the second general election” for “for the next ensuing general election to be held in November in the case of county, city, or town officers regularly elected in November, or in May in the case of other city and town officers” and deleted the fourth sentence, which read: “If the vacancy occurs within 120 days prior to that election, however, the writ shall order the election to be held at the second ensuing such general election.”

The 2010 amendments by cc. 449 and 645 are identical, and substituted “forty-fifth day” for “thirtieth day” in subsection A.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 206, in the third sentence in subsection A, inserted “in November, or in May if the vacant office is regularly scheduled by law to be filled at that time” and twice inserted “such” preceding “general election.”

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 476 in subsection A substituted “and shall order the special election to be held on the date of” for “which shall be no later than,” “in May. However, if the governing body or the school board requests in its petition a different date for the election, the court shall order the special election be held on that date, so long as the date requested precedes the date of such next general election and complies with the provisions of §

24.2-682

” for “at that time,” “If” for “unless,” inserted “and the governing body or the school board has not requested in its petition a different date for the election, the special election shall be held on the date of,” and deleted “in which event it shall be held promptly but no later than” preceding “the second such general election.”

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

5A M.J. Counties, § 34.

§ 24.2-227.
Interim appointment by court until vacancy filled by election for certain offices.

When a vacancy occurs in any local elected office other than a constitutional office, local governing body, or an elected school board, a majority of the judges of the judicial circuit for the county or city in which it occurs shall make an interim appointment to the office until the vacancy can be filled by special election. The senior judge shall make the appointment if a majority of the judges cannot agree. The chief or senior deputy, if there is one in the office, shall perform all the duties of the office until the person appointed to fill the vacancy has qualified. The person so appointed shall hold office until the qualified voters fill the vacancy by election and the person so elected has qualified.

History.

Code 1950, § 24-145; 1958, c. 621; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-76; 1975, c. 515; 1976, c. 616; 1977, c. 490; 1984, c. 480; 1993, c. 641; 1996, c. 873; 2000, cc. 787, 1070.

Cross references.

As to conditions and procedures for special elections to fill vacancies in constitutional offices, see §

24.2-228.1

.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendments by cc. 787 and 1070, and effective October 1, 2000, are identical, and in the first sentence, deleted “constitutional or” preceding “local elected” and inserted “constitutional office” preceding “local governing.”

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

15 M.J. Public Officers, § 28.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Candidate lacked intent to become resident. —

Candidate elected to city council as a representative of the beach district was not eligible to run for the seat where, considering the testimony, credibility of the witnesses, exhibits, and applicable law, the candidate did not have the intent to establish residency at an apartment in the district, but only intended to acquire an address in order to run for city council as a representative of the district. As a result, in accordance with §

24.2-812

, there had been no valid election of any person, the election of the candidate was void, and the vacancy was to be filled in conformity with §§

24.2-226

and

24.2-227

. Uhrin v. Nygaard, 101 Va. Cir. 252, 2019 Va. Cir. LEXIS 54 (Virginia Beach Mar. 5, 2019).

§ 24.2-228.
Interim appointment to local governing body or elected school board; elected mayor.

When a vacancy occurs in a local governing body or an elected school board, the remaining members of the body or board, respectively, within 45 days of the office becoming vacant, may appoint a qualified voter of the election district in which the vacancy occurred to fill the vacancy. If a majority of the remaining members of the body or board cannot agree, or do not act, the judges of the circuit court of the county or city may make the appointment. Notwithstanding any charter provisions to the contrary, the person so appointed shall hold office only until the qualified voters fill the vacancy by special election pursuant to §

24.2-682

and the person so elected has qualified. Any person so appointed shall hold office the same as an elected person and shall exercise all powers of the elected office.If a majority of the seats on any governing body or elected school board are vacant, the remaining members shall not make interim appointments and the vacancies shall be filled as provided in §

24.2-227

.

When a vacancy occurs in the office of a mayor who is elected by the voters, the council shall make an interim appointment to fill the vacancy as provided in subsection A.

For the purposes of this article and subsection D of § 22.1-57.3, local school boards comprised of elected and appointed members shall be deemed elected school boards.

The failure of a member of a local governing body or elected school board or mayor to take the oath of office required by §

49-1

before attending the first meeting of the governing body or school board held after his election shall not be deemed to create a vacancy in his office provided that he takes the oath within 30 days after that first meeting.

History.

1975, c. 515, § 24.1-76.1; 1993, c. 641; 1996, c. 873; 1999, c. 128; 2010, cc. 431, 624; 2011, c. 78.

The 1999 amendment

substituted “forty-five days” for “thirty days” in the first sentence in subsection A.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 431, in subsection A, substituted “may” for “shall” twice, substituted “Notwithstanding any charter provisions to the contrary, the person” for “the person,” deleted “in a county or city, or a town with a population greater than 3,500”
following “person so appointed,” inserted “only” following “shall hold office,” substituted “§

24.2-682

” for “§

24.2-226

,” deleted the last sentence, which read: “The person so appointed in a town with a population of 3,500 or less shall serve for the remainder of the term and no special election shall be held,” and made a minor stylistic change.

The 2010 amendment by c. 624, in subsection A, added the last sentence in the first paragraph and made a minor stylistic change.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 78 added subsection D.

Law Review.

For annual survey article, “Election Law and Government,” see 46 U. Rich. L. Rev. 119 (2011).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

5A M.J. Counties, § 34.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

In the case of call to active military duty

of a member of a county board of supervisors, this section and §

24.2-226

do not require that a special election be held at the next general election. See opinion of Attorney General to Mr. Darvin E. Satterwhite, County Attorney for Cumberland County, 04-016 (3/22/04).

Filling vacancy in town council. —

Under a charter providing that the town council “may fill any vacancy that occurs in the membership of the council,” the council is authorized to appoint an individual to serve the remaining years of an unexpired term; however, the council is not authorized to appoint such individual when the vacancy has existed for more than forty-five days. In such case, pursuant to §

24.2-226

, the council may petition the circuit court to issue a writ of election to fill the vacancy in an election that complies with the requirements of Article VII, § 5 of the Virginia Constitution See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Clifford L. “Clay” Athey, Jr., Member, House of Delegates 08-092 (12/3/08).

An individual appointed to serve an unexpired term on the town council

is not an elected member as that term is used in Title 15.2. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Clifford L. “Clay” Athey, Jr., Member, House of Delegates 08-092 (12/3/08).

Vacancy in the office of mayor. —

In the context of a recall election for which one or more candidates meet the requirements to be listed on the recall ballot for possible election to the city office that is the subject of the recall, a possible vacancy in that office would be filled pursuant to the recall provisions of the city charter. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable L. Louise Lucas, Member, Senate of Virginia, 10-054, 2010 Va. AG LEXIS 34 (6/25/10).

School Board member called to active duty. —

School board member who is a reserve military officer being called into active service for a temporary deployment does not have the right to determine whether an appointment will be made to fill his temporarily vacant position, nor the right of approval over a temporary replacement. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Richard H. Stuart, Member, Senate of Virginia, 16-049, 2016 Va. AG LEXIS 31 (12/9/16).

Vacancy due to military duty. —

In the case of a vacancy due to a call of active military duty, the appropriate appointing government body has the duty and authority to fill the vacancy with a temporary replacement until the departing official can return from deployment and complete the remainder of the term he/she was elected. See opinion of Attorney General to the Honorable Rich H. Stuart, member Senate of Virginia, 16-049, 2016 Va. AG LEXIS 31 (12/9/16).

§ 24.2-228.1.
Election to fill vacancy in constitutional office.

Notwithstanding any provision of a charter to the contrary, a vacancy in any elected constitutional office, whether occurring when for any reason an officer-elect does not take office or occurring after an officer begins his term, shall be filled by special election, except as provided in subsection B. Within 15 days of the occurrence of the vacancy, the governing body of the county or city in which the vacancy occurs shall petition the circuit court to issue a writ of election to fill the vacancy as set forth in Article 5 (§

24.2-681

et seq.) of Chapter 6. Either upon receipt of the petition or on its own motion, the court shall promptly issue the writ ordering the election for a date determined pursuant to §

24.2-682

. However, the governing body may request in its petition that the special election be held on the date of the next general election in November, and the court may order the special election to be held on that date.

If a vacancy in any elected constitutional office occurs within the 12 months immediately preceding the end of the term of that office, the governing body may petition the circuit court to request that no special election be ordered. Upon receipt of such petition, the court shall grant such request. The highest ranking deputy officer, or in the case of the office of attorney for the Commonwealth, the highest ranking full-time assistant attorney for the Commonwealth, who is qualified to vote for and hold that office, shall be vested with the powers and shall perform all of the duties of the office, and shall be entitled to all the privileges and protections afforded by law to elected or appointed constitutional officers, for the remainder of the unexpired term.

Upon receipt of written notification by an officer or officer-elect of his resignation as of a stated date, the governing body may immediately petition the circuit court to issue a writ of election, and the court may immediately issue the writ to call the election. The officer’s or officer-elect’s resignation shall not be revocable after the date stated by him for his resignation or after the thirtieth day before the date set for the special election.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection A, a vacancy in any elected constitutional office in any county or city with a population of 15,000 or less, or shared by two or more units of government with a combined population of 15,000 or less, shall be filled by a special election ordered by the court to be held at the next ensuing general election to be held in November. If the vacancy occurs within 90 days prior to that election, however, the writ shall order the election to be held at the second ensuing such general election.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, no election to fill a vacancy shall be ordered or held if the general election at which it is to be called is scheduled within 60 days of the end of the term of the office to be filled.

Notwithstanding any provision of a charter to the contrary, the highest ranking deputy officer, or in the case of the office of attorney for the Commonwealth, the highest ranking full-time assistant attorney for the Commonwealth, if there is such a deputy or assistant in the office, who is qualified to vote for and hold that office, shall be vested with the powers and shall perform all of the duties of the office, and shall be entitled to all the privileges and protections afforded by law to elected or appointed constitutional officers, until the qualified voters fill the vacancy by election and the person so elected has qualified and taken the oath of office. In the event that (i) there is no deputy officer or full-time assistant attorney for the Commonwealth in the office or (ii) the highest-ranking deputy officer or assistant attorney for the Commonwealth declines to serve, the court shall make an interim appointment to fill the vacancy pursuant to §

24.2-227

until the qualified voters fill the vacancy by election and the person so elected has qualified and taken the oath of office.

The absence from the county or city of a constitutional officer by reason of his service in the Armed Forces of the United States shall not be deemed to create a vacancy in the office without a written notification by the officer of his resignation from the office. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, including §

19.2-156

, the power to relieve a constitutional officer of the duties or powers of his office or position during the period of such absence shall remain the sole prerogative of the constitutional officer unless expressly waived by him in writing.

History.

2000, cc. 787, 1070; 2003, c. 1015; 2006, cc. 120, 253; 2009, c. 157; 2011, c. 599; 2015, c. 648; 2016, cc. 453, 511.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 1015, in subsection A, substituted “15” for “fifteen” in the second sentence, and inserted the last two sentences; and substituted “60” for “sixty” in subsection C.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 120 added subsection D.

The 2006 amendment by c. 253 inserted “Notwithstanding any provision of a charter to the contrary” at the beginning of subsection A.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 157, effective March 16, 2009, added the last two sentences in subsection A.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 599, in subsection A, deleted “of this title” from the end of the second sentence, and substituted “90 days” for “120 days” in the last sentence.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 648 substituted “filled by” for “held at” in the sixth sentence of subsection A and added “Notwithstanding any provision of a charter to the contrary” at the beginning of subsection B.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendments by cc. 453 and 511 are identical, and in subsection A, inserted the exception in the first sentence, transferred “within 15 days of the occurrence of the vacancy” formerly preceding “petition” in the second sentence to the beginning of that sentence and added the last sentence; added subsection B, redesignated and transferred former subsection C as subsection E, inserted the subsection C and D designations, and made related changes; in subsection D, substituted “provisions of subsection A” for “foregoing provisions” in the first sentence; in subsection F, inserted “who is qualified to vote for and hold that office.”

Law Review.

For 2006 survey article, “Election Law,” see 41 U. Rich. L. Rev. 121 (2006).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

4A M.J. Commonwealth’s and State’s Attorney, § 3.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Nonresident officer. —

When the powers of a vacant constitutional office are assumed by the highest ranking deputy within the office as provided by subsection B [now subsection F] of
§

24.2-228.1

, the deputy need not be a resident of the locality of service. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Rex A. Davis, Clerk of Court, Newport News Circuit Court, No. 14-045, 2014 Va. AG LEXIS 61 (11/13/14).

Definition of constitutional officer. —

A member of a local school board is not considered a constitutional officer. See opinion of Attorney General to the Honorable Rich H. Stuart, member Senate of Virginia, 16-049, 2016 Va. AG LEXIS 31 (12/9/16).

§ 24.2-229.
Appointees to qualify and give bond in thirty days.

All officers appointed to fill vacancies shall qualify and give bond, if bond is required, within thirty days after their appointment in like manner as provided in §§

15.2-1522

and

15.2-1523

for the qualification of such officers when elected by the people.

History.

Code 1950, § 24-146; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-77; 1975, c. 515; 1993, c. 641.

§ 24.2-229.1.
Legitimacy of votes by appointees.

All votes cast prior to July 1, 2010, by persons duly appointed to fill a vacancy pursuant to this article, including votes appropriating money in excess of $500, imposing taxes, or authorizing the borrowing of moneys, are hereby validated and confirmed as the lawful vote of an elected member of the governing body.

History.

2010, c. 624.